Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2118
Examination of books and records.

To aid in the enforcement of the Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act, the Director of Banking and Finance may examine the books and records of any lessor at least once a year. The expense of the examination shall be assessed against such lessor.

Laws 1993, LB 111, § 7.